Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2240.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 5866XS (1) 91 jm/jh S.F. 2240 Section 1. Section 403.19A, subsection 3, paragraph c, 1 subparagraph (2), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 2 (2) The pilot project city and the economic development 3 authority shall not enter into a withholding agreement after 4 June 30, 2027 2030 . 5